Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,131
Health care coverages or services; applicability of provisions.

No legislative proposal to mandate or require the offering of health care coverages or services shall apply to any insurer unless the proposal applies equally to employee welfare benefit plans described in 29 U.S.C. 1001 et seq.

Laws 1986, LB 895, § 3.